Utah statutes.
10-1-306.   Rules for delivered value and point of sale.
(1)  The delivered value of taxable energy under this part shall be
established pursuant to rules made by the commission in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(2)  The rules made by the commission under Subsection (1):
(a)  shall provide that an arm’s length sales price for taxable energy sold
or used by a taxpayer in the municipality is the delivered value, unless the
sales price does not include some portion of the taxable energy or component
of delivered value;
(b)  shall establish one or more default methods for determining the delivered
value for each customer class one time per calendar year on or before January
31 for taxable energy when the commission determines that the sales price does
not accurately reflect delivered value; and
(c)  shall provide that for purposes of determining the point of sale or use
of taxable energy the location of the meter is normally the point of sale or
use unless the taxpayer demonstrates that the use is not in a municipality
imposing the municipal energy sales and use tax.
(3)  In establishing a default method under Subsection (2)(b), the commission:
(a)  shall take into account quantity discounts and other reductions or
increases in value that are generally available in the marketplace for various
grades or types of property and classes of services; and
(b)  may consider:
(i)  generally applicable tariffs for various classes of utility services
approved by the Public Service Commission or other governmental entity;
(ii)  posted prices;
(iii)  spot-market prices;
(iv)  trade publications;
(v)  market data; and
(vi)  other information and data prescribed by the commission.
